Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5979.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1290. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board of a school district or intermediate school district shall not prohibit the participation of a nonpublic pupil who resides within the school district or intermediate school district in any extracurricular activities offered by a school operated by the board. (2) An athletic association, conference, or any other group with authority over extracurricular activities shall not prohibit a nonpublic pupil's participation in an extracurricular activity if the nonpublic pupil meets all the requirements of this section. (3) The board of a school district or intermediate school district may require a nonpublic pupil to do all of the following before the nonpublic pupil participates in any extracurricular activity offered by the school district or intermediate school district: (a) Demonstrate academic eligibility through 1 of the following: (i) A portfolio of work. (ii) A nationally norm-referenced standardized test. (iii) A signed affidavit from the nonpublic pupil's parent or legal guardian attesting that the nonpublic pupil is in good academic standing. (b) Comply with the same conduct, attendance, and disciplinary standards applicable to enrolled pupils participating in the same extracurricular activity. (c) Participate in tryouts, auditions, or competitive selection processes on the same basis as enrolled pupils. (4) The board of a school district or intermediate school district shall not require a nonpublic pupil to enroll in 1 or more courses or otherwise become a part-time or full-time enrolled pupil of the school district or intermediate school district as a condition of participation under this section. (5) The board of a school district or intermediate school district may charge a nonpublic pupil a participation fee that does not exceed the participation fee charged to enrolled pupils for the same extracurricular activity. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district is not required to provide transportation to a nonpublic pupil participating in an extracurricular activity under this section. (7) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the board of a school district or intermediate school district shall not deny the participation of a nonpublic pupil in an extracurricular activity based on a capacity limitation unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The extracurricular activity has a documented capacity limitation that was established before the commencement of tryouts or the selection process. (b) The capacity limitation is applied equally to enrolled pupils and nonpublic pupils. (c) Selection for participation in the extracurricular activity is based on objective and uniformly applied criteria, including a nonpublic pupil or enrolled pupil's performance in the selection process. (8) The board of a school district or intermediate school district shall not establish or modify a capacity limitation under subsection (7) for the purpose of excluding nonpublic pupils. (9) By not later than July 1 of each year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district shall prepare and submit an annual report to the department and to each house of the legislature. The report must include all of the following information for the preceding school year: (a) The number of nonpublic pupils who applied to participate in an extracurricular activity offered by a school district or intermediate school district. (b) The number of nonpublic pupils approved to participate in an extracurricular activity offered by a school district or intermediate school district. (c) The number of nonpublic pupils denied participation in an extracurricular activity offered by a school district or intermediate school district. (d) The specific reason for each denial under subdivision (c), using 1 of the following categories: (i) Academic ineligibility. (ii) Disciplinary ineligibility. (iii) Capacity limitation. (iv) Other. A denial under this subparagraph must have a written explanation. (10) The department shall publish the reports required under subsection (9) in a publicly accessible and searchable format on the department's website. (11) A nonpublic pupil or the nonpublic pupil's parent or legal guardian alleging a violation of this section may bring a civil action for appropriate injunctive relief, actual damages, reasonable attorney fees, and the costs of bringing the action. (12) In addition to any other relief provided by this section, a court may also impose on the board of a school district or intermediate school district a civil fine of not more than $15,000.00 per violation. Each civil fine collected must be deposited in the general fund of this state. (13) As used in this section: (a) "Enrolled pupil" means a pupil enrolled in a public school. (b) "Extracurricular activity" means any interscholastic athletics, clubs, performing arts, and other school-sponsored activities not part of a school's required instructional program. (c) "Nonpublic pupil" means a school-age child who is a student in a nonpublic school or home school.